Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

Commercial Fertilizers

43-11-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Commercial Fertilizer Law of 1969.”

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A., § 43-1121.

Cross-References. Agricultural production inputs, title 43, ch. 31.

Lien for farm implements and supplies, § 66-12-103.

Soil conservation, title 43, ch. 14.

Comparative Legislation. Fertilizers:

Ala. Code § 2-22-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-19-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-12-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 250.360 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 75-47-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 266.291 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-655 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-74 et seq.

Collateral References. 3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 42 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 74-82.

Constitutionality, construction and application of statutes relating to testing or sampling of agricultural fertilizers. 105 A.L.R. 348, 147 A.L.R. 765.

Liability of manufacturer or seller for injury caused by animal feed or medicines, crop sprays, fertilizers, insecticides, rodenticides and similar products. 12 A.L.R.4th 462, 29 A.L.R.4th 1045.

Agriculture
1, 7.

43-11-102. Administration of part.

This part shall be administered by the commissioner of agriculture.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-1122.

43-11-103. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Brand” means a term, design, or trademark used in connection with one (1) or several grades of commercial fertilizer;

“Bulk fertilizers” means commercial fertilizer distributed in a nonpackaged form;

“Commercial fertilizer” means any substance containing one (1) or more recognized plant nutrients that is used for its plant nutrient content and that is designed for use or claimed to have value in promoting plant growth, except unmanipulated animal and vegetable manures, marl, lime, limestone, wood ashes and gypsum;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Deficiency” means the amount of nutrient found by analysis less than that guaranteed that may result from a lack of nutrient ingredients or from a lack of uniformity;

“Distributor” means any person who imports, consigns, manufactures, produces, compounds, mixes, or blends commercial fertilizer, or who offers for sale, sells, barters, or otherwise supplies commercial fertilizer in this state;

“Fertilizer material” is a fertilizer that either:

Contains important quantities of no more than one (1) of the primary plant nutrients (nitrogen, phosphoric acid and potash);

Has approximately eighty-five percent (85%) of its plant nutrient content present in the form of a single chemical compound; or

Is derived from a plant or animal residue or by-product or a natural material deposit that has been processed in such a way that its content of primary plant nutrients has not been materially changed except by purification and concentration;

“Grade” means the percentages of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or phosphoric acid, and soluble potassium or soluble potash stated in whole numbers in the same terms, order and percentages as in the “guaranteed analysis”;

“Guaranteed analysis”:

Until the commissioner prescribes the alternative form of “guaranteed analysis” in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (9)(B), “guaranteed analysis” means the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed in the following order and form:

Available Phosphoric Acid (P205) percent

Soluble Potash (K20) percent

Total Nitrogen (N) percent

For unacidulated mineral phosphatic materials and basis slag, both total and available phosphoric acid and the degree of fineness. For bone, tankage, and other organic phosphatic materials, total phosphoric acid;

Guarantees for plant nutrients other than nitrogen, phosphorus and potassium may be permitted or required by regulation of the commissioner. The guarantees for plant nutrients other than nitrogen, phosphorus and potassium shall be expressed in the form of the element. The sources of such other nutrients (oxides, salt, chelates, etc.) may be required to be stated on the application for registration and may be included as a parenthetical statement on the label. Other beneficial substances or compounds, determinable by laboratory methods, also may be guaranteed by permission of the commissioner and with the advice of the director of the agricultural experiment station. When any plant nutrients or other substances or compounds are guaranteed, they shall be subject to inspection and analysis in accordance with the methods and regulations prescribed by the commissioner; and

Potential basicity or acidity expressed in terms of calcium carbonate equivalent in multiples of one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) per ton, when required by regulation; and

When the commissioner finds, after public hearing following due notice, that the requirement for expressing the guaranteed analysis of phosphorus and potassium in elemental form would not impose an economic hardship on distributors and users of fertilizer by reason of conflicting labeling requirements among the states, the commissioner may require by regulation thereafter that the “guaranteed analysis” shall be in the following form:

Total Nitrogen (N) percent

Available Phosphorus (P) percent

Soluble Potassium (K) percent

provided, that the effective date of the regulation shall not be less than six (6) months following the issuance of the regulation; and provided further, that for a period of two (2) years following the effective date of the regulation, the equivalent of phosphorus and potassium may also be shown in the form of phosphoric acid and potash. After the effective date of a regulation issued under this subdivision (9)(B), requiring that phosphorus and potassium be shown in the elemental form, the guaranteed analysis for nitrogen, phosphorus, and potassium shall constitute the grade;

“Investigational allowance” means an allowance for variations inherent in the taking, preparation, and analysis of an official sample;

“Label” means the display of all written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container, or a statement accompanying a fertilizer;

“Labeling” means all written, printed, or graphic matter upon or accompanying any fertilizer, or advertisements, brochures, posters, television, and radio announcements used in promoting the sale of such fertilizer;

“Local legislation” means, but is not limited to, any ordinance, motion, resolution, amendment, regulation or rule adopted by a political subdivision;

“Mixed fertilizer” is a commercial fertilizer containing any combination or mixtures of fertilizer materials designed for use or claimed to have value in promoting plant growth;

“Official sample” means any sample of commercial fertilizer taken by the commissioner or the commissioner's agent and designated as “official” by the commissioner;

“Overall index value” means the value of a fertilizer as determined by comparing the value guaranteed with the value found, using as a basis for value the commercial value of a nutrient or ingredient per § 43-11-110;

“Percent” or “percentage” means the percentage by weight;

“Person” includes an individual, partnership, association, firm, and corporation;

“Political subdivision” means any local government entity and includes, but is not limited to, any city, county or municipal government and any other body corporate and politic that is responsible for government activities in a geographic area smaller than the state;

“Registrant” means the person who registers commercial fertilizer under this part;

“Soil conditioner or soil amendment” means any substance that is intended to improve the physical characteristics of the soil, except agricultural liming materials, unmanipulated animal manures, unmanipulated vegetable manures, pesticides, and other materials exempted by regulation;

“Specialty fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer distributed primarily for nonfarm use, such as home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, municipal parks, cemeteries, greenhouses and nurseries;

“Ton” means a net weight of two thousand pounds (2,000 lbs.) avoirdupois; and

“Unmanipulated manure” means any substance composed of the excreta of domestic animals or domestic fowls that has not been processed in any manner, including drying, grinding, shredding, addition of plant food, mixing artificially with any material or materials other than those that have been used for bedding, sanitary, or feeding purposes for the animals or fowls, or any other means.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 3; T.C.A., § 43-1123; Acts 1986, ch. 659, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 544, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1040, § 3 provided that the provisions adding the definitions for “local legislation” and “political subdivision” to this section shall not apply in any county having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2008 amendment added the definitions for “local legislation” and “political subdivision”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 1040, § 4. May 28, 2008.

43-11-104. Annual licence fee.

Every person who distributes commercial fertilizer in this state shall pay an annual license fee set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 4; T.C.A., § 43-1124; Acts 1988, ch. 544, § 3; 2015, ch. 485, § 11.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) Each brand and grade of commercial fertilizer shall be registered before being distributed in this state. The application for registration shall be submitted to the commissioner on forms furnished by the commissioner. All brands sold in packages of twenty-five pounds (25 lbs.) or less shall be registered at a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each. Upon approval by the commissioner, a copy of the registration shall be furnished to the applicant. All registrations expire on June 30 of each year. The application shall include the following information:“(1) The net weight;“(2) The brand and grade;“(3) The guaranteed analysis;“(4) The name and address of the registrant; and“(5) The sources from which the nitrogen, phosphorus, and potassium are derived.“(b) A distributor shall not be required to register any brand of commercial fertilizer that is already registered under this part by another person.“(c) A distributor shall not be required to register a commercial fertilizer formulated according to specifications that are furnished by a consumer prior to mixing, but shall be required to label such fertilizer as provided in § 43-11-105(c).“(d) For all specialty fertilizers, soil amendments and soil conditioners, the registrant shall submit to the commissioner two (2) labels or copies of each label of each brand and grade, together with the registration application. For all specialty fertilizers, soil amendments and soil conditioners, the registrant shall submit a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per brand and grade regardless of package size.“(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commissioner or the commissioner's agent from denying registration pending the submission of all requested information and the completion of any required changes necessary for any fertilizer to be in full compliance with this chapter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015 for the purpose of promulgating rules.

43-11-105. Labeling.

Any commercial fertilizer distributed in this state in containers shall have placed on or affixed to the container a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous form the information required by § 43-11-104(a)(1)-(4).

If distributed in bulk, a written or printed statement of the information required by § 43-11-104(a)(1)-(4) shall accompany delivery and be supplied to the purchaser at time of delivery.

A commercial fertilizer formulated according to specifications that are furnished by a consumer prior to mixing shall be labeled to show the net weight, guaranteed analysis, and the name and address of the distributor or the registrant, together with the name and address of the consumer.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 5; T.C.A., § 43-1125; Acts 1986, ch. 659, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Section 43-11-104, referred to in this section, was rewritten by Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 11, effective July 1, 2015. As rewritten, the section no longer contains the registration application requirements formerly set out in (a)(1)-(4).

43-11-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 6; 1972, ch. 628, § 1; T.C.A., § 43-1126; Acts 1986, ch. 659, §§ 4, 5; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 12, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Note. Former § 43-11-106 concerned inspection fees.

43-11-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 7; T.C.A., § 43-1127; Acts 1986, ch. 659, § 6; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 13, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Note. Former § 43-11-107 concerned tonnage reports.

43-11-108. Inspection, sampling, analysis.

It is the duty of the commissioner or the commissioner's agent to sample, inspect, make analysis of, and test commercial fertilizer distributed within this state, and the commissioner or agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises or carriers at a time and place and to such extent as the commissioner or agent may deem necessary to determine whether their commercial fertilizers are in compliance with this part.

The methods of analysis and sampling shall be those adopted by the official from sources such as the Association of Official Analytical Chemists Journal.

The commissioner, in determining for administrative purposes whether any commercial fertilizer is deficient in plant food, shall be guided solely by the official sample as defined in § 43-11-103, and obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsection (b).

The results of official analysis of any commercial fertilizer that has been found to be subject to penalty or other legal action shall be forwarded by the commissioner to the registrant at least ten (10) days before the report is submitted to the purchaser. If during that period no adequate evidence to the contrary is made available to the commissioner, the report shall become official. Upon request, the commissioner shall furnish to the registrant a portion of any sample found subject to penalty or other legal action.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 8; T.C.A., § 43-1128; Acts 1986, ch. 659, § 7.

43-11-109. Fertilizer deficiency — Penalties.

If the analysis shall show that any commercial fertilizer falls short of the guaranteed analysis, penalties shall be assessed by the commissioner as follows:

When a deficiency in the analysis of any one (1) primary ingredient (nitrogen, phosphorus or potash) is greater than two (2) times the investigational allowance for that ingredient, penalties will be assessed in the amount of three (3) times the commercial value of the deficiency;

When a deficiency in the analysis of any one (1) primary ingredient is two (2) or less times the investigational allowance for that ingredient, an overall index value will be calculated. When the overall index value is less than ninety-seven percent (97%), the penalty assessed shall be three (3) times the difference between the found commercial value and the guaranteed commercial value of the primary nutrients;

When an analysis of any one (1) primary ingredient results in both a deficiency greater than two (2) times the investigation allowances and an overall index value of less than ninety-seven percent (97%), the greater of the two (2) penalties will be assessed. In no instance will the penalty assessed be greater than the retail value of the lot of fertilizer; and

When an analysis of any one (1) secondary nutrient (minor elements) is deemed deficient by exceeding the allowable deficiencies established by regulation, penalties assessed will be in the amount of three (3) times the commercial value of the deficiency.

When assessing penalties for fertilizer found to be deficient, tolerances and investigational allowances established by the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials and published in the annual official publication shall be recognized.

Deficiency in any other constituent or constituents covered under § 43-11-103(9)(A)(i), (ii) and (iii) that the registrant is required to or may guarantee shall be evaluated by the commissioner and penalties therefor shall be prescribed by the commissioner.

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent any person from appealing to a court of competent jurisdiction for judgment as to the justification of penalties.

All penalties assessed under this section shall be paid to the consumer of the lot of commercial fertilizer represented by the sample analyzed within two (2) months after the date of notice from the commissioner to the registrant, receipts taken therefor and promptly forwarded to the commissioner. If these consumers cannot be found, the amount of the penalty shall be paid to the department of agriculture, and shall be used only for the enforcement of this part. If, upon satisfactory evidence, a distributor is shown to have altered the content of a fertilizer shipped to such distributor by a registrant, or to have mixed or commingled fertilizer from two (2) or more supplies such that the result of either alteration changes the analysis of the fertilizer as originally guaranteed, then that distributor shall become responsible for obtaining a registration and shall be held liable for all penalty payments and be subject to other provisions of this part, including seizure, condemnation and stop sale.

A deficiency in an official sample of mixed fertilizer resulting from nonuniformity shall be handled in the same manner as a deficiency due to actual plant nutrient shortage.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 9; 1977, ch. 166, § 1; T.C.A., § 43-1129; Acts 1986, ch. 659, § 8; 1988, ch. 544, § 4.

43-11-110. Commercial value.

For the purpose of determining the commercial values to be applied under the provisions of § 43-11-109, the commissioner shall determine and publish annually the values per pound of nitrogen, available phosphoric acid, and soluble potash in commercial fertilizers in this state. If guarantees are as provided in § 43-11-103(9)(B), the values shall be per pound of nitrogen, phosphorus, and potassium. The values so determined and published shall be used in determining and assessing penalties.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 10; T.C.A., § 43-1130.

43-11-111. Soil conditioners.

No soil conditioner, soil amendment, or any other material designed or claimed to improve the physical characteristics of the soil may be sold in this state until those products meet all of the requirements of this chapter and the regulations promulgated under this chapter, including the payment of inspection fees.

If the analysis shows that any soil amendment, soil conditioner, or similar product falls short of the guaranteed analysis in any one (1) ingredient or in total ingredients, then a penalty shall be assessed by the commissioner in the amount of three (3) times the larger deficiency. A minimum penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be assessed on any deficiency of such product. Investigational allowances and total ingredient values shall be established by regulation and shall follow the Official Publication of the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials if applicable. All penalties shall be paid in the manner prescribed by § 43-11-109.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 11; 1972, ch. 628, § 2; T.C.A., § 43-1131; Acts 1988, ch. 544, § 5.

43-11-112. Misbranded fertilizer — Distribution prohibited.

Commercial fertilizer is misbranded if it carries a false or misleading statement on the container, on the label attached to the container, or if false or misleading statements concerning the fertilizer are disseminated in any manner or by any means. It is unlawful to distribute a misbranded fertilizer.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 12; T.C.A., § 43-1132.

Cross-References. Distribution of adulterated fertilizer products, § 43-11-124.

43-11-113. Rules and regulations.

For the enforcement of this part, the commissioner is authorized to prescribe and, after a hearing following due notice, to enforce such rules and regulations relating to the distribution of commercial fertilizers as the commissioner may find necessary to carry into effect the full intent and meaning of this part.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 13; T.C.A., § 43-1133.

43-11-114. Penalty for short weight.

If any commercial fertilizer in the possession of the consumer is found by the commissioner to be short in weight, the registrant of the commercial fertilizer shall, within thirty (30) days after official notice from the commissioner, pay to the consumer a penalty equal to three (3) times the value of the actual shortage.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 14; T.C.A., § 43-1134; Acts 1986, ch. 659, § 9.

43-11-115. “Stop sale, use, or removal” orders.

The commissioner may issue and enforce a written or printed “stop sale, use, or removal” order to the owner or custodian of any lot of commercial fertilizer, and may order the owner or custodian to hold the fertilizer at a designated place, when the commissioner finds the commercial fertilizer is being offered or exposed for sale in violation of any of the provisions of this part, until the law has been complied with and the commercial fertilizer is released in writing by the commissioner, or the violation has been otherwise legally disposed of by written authority. The commissioner shall release the commercial fertilizer so withdrawn when the requirements of this part have been complied with and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the withdrawal have been paid.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 15; T.C.A., § 43-1135.

43-11-116. Seizure, condemnation, and sale.

Any lot of commercial fertilizer not in compliance with this part shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the commissioner to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the commercial fertilizer is located. In the event the court finds the commercial fertilizer to be in violation of this part and orders the condemnation of the commercial fertilizer, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial fertilizer and the laws of the state; provided, that in no instance shall the disposition of the commercial fertilizer be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial fertilizer or for permission to process or re-label the commercial fertilizer to bring it into compliance with this part.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 16; T.C.A., § 43-1136.

43-11-117. Revocation of registration — Hearing — Subpoenas — Certiorari and review — New registration.

The commissioner has the authority to revoke any registration certificate for violation of any of the provisions of this part, or the rules and regulations promulgated under this part. The commissioner can refuse registration privileges when the product does not meet the requirements of this part. Upon information received, the commissioner shall, by written notice, establish a hearing for the registrant. The hearing shall be held within fifteen (15) days from the date of the mailing of the notice. If, after the hearing, the commissioner revokes the registration, then the right of appeal is reserved to the registrant. The commissioner has the power to subpoena any persons or records incident to the hearing and to administer oaths to those giving evidence. In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any circuit or chancery court of this state within the county in which the investigation is carried on, or in which the person guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found or resides or transacts business, or where that person's principal place of business is located, upon application by the commissioner, shall have jurisdiction to issue to that person an order requiring that person to appear before the commissioner at a specified time and place and then and there produce evidence, if so ordered, or there to give testimony touching the matter under investigation or subject of inquiry, or answer any question, and any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof as provided by law. A court reporter shall be in attendance at all registration revocation hearings.

The action of the commissioner may be reviewed by petition for statutory writ of certiorari addressed to the circuit or chancery court where the offense occurs, and the petition shall be filed within ten (10) days from the date of the order of revocation issued by the commissioner. Upon the grant of the writ of certiorari, the commissioner shall certify to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings instituted before the commissioner. This certified transcript shall constitute the whole record, and no additional proof or evidence shall be considered by the court. The decision of the commissioner shall remain final until the matter has been finally resolved by the courts.

If, after revocation of the registrant's registration, the registrant complies with requirements of the law as provided and makes manifest in writing the registrant's intentions to forthwith observe the law, upon payment of the cost of the hearing the commissioner may reissue a new registration upon payment of the required fees. Reapplication may be made on such forms as provided by the commissioner, except in no case will reissuance of registration privileges be allowed where fraudulent or deceptive practices are shown.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 17; T.C.A., § 43-1137.

43-11-118. Notice of violations — Hearing — Certification of facts to prosecuting attorney.

If it appears from the examination of any commercial fertilizer that any of the provisions of this part or the rules and regulations issued under this part have been violated, the commissioner shall cause notice of the violations to be given to the registrant, distributor, or possessor from whom the sample was taken; any person so notified shall be given an opportunity to be heard under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the commissioner. If it appears after the hearing, either in the presence or absence of the person so notified, that this part or rules and regulations issued under this part have been violated, the commissioner may certify the facts to the proper district attorney general.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 17; T.C.A., § 43-1138.

43-11-119. Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates or aids in violating any provision of this part, or any rules and regulations promulgated under this part, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 17; T.C.A., § 43-1139; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Cited: Horn v. State, 553 S.W.2d 736, 1977 Tenn. LEXIS 588 (Tenn. 1977).

43-11-120. Prosecution of minor violations not required — Notice of warning.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as requiring the commissioner or the commissioner's representative to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure proceedings as a result of minor violations of this part when the commissioner believes that the public interests will be best served by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 17; T.C.A., § 43-1140.

43-11-121. Duty of district attorney general.

It is the duty of each district attorney general to whom any violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without delay.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 17; T.C.A., § 43-1141.

43-11-122. Injunctions against violations.

The commissioner is authorized to make application to any chancery court of this state for a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this part or any rule or regulation promulgated under this part, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. This injunction is to be issued without bond.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 17; T.C.A., § 43-1142.

43-11-123. Exchanges between manufacturers.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to restrict or avoid sales or exchanges of commercial fertilizers to each other by importers, manufacturers, or manipulators who mix fertilizer materials for sale or as preventing the free and unrestricted shipments of commercial fertilizer to manufacturers or manipulators who have registered their brands as required by the provisions of this part.

Acts 1969, ch. 102, § 18; T.C.A., § 43-1143.

43-11-124. Distribution of adulterated fertilizer products.

No person shall distribute an adulterated fertilizer product. A fertilizer shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

It contains any deleterious or harmful ingredient in sufficient amount to render it injurious to beneficial plant life when applied in accordance with directions for use on the label, or if adequate warning statements or directions for use that may be necessary to protect plant life are not shown upon the label;

Its composition falls below or differs from what it is purported to possess by its labeling; or

It contains unwanted crop seed or weed seed.

Acts 1986, ch. 659, § 10.

43-11-125. Local legislation.

No political subdivision may regulate the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, use and application of fertilizers; and, in addition, no political subdivision may adopt or continue in effect local legislation relating to the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, use or application of fertilizers. Local legislation in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.

Subsection (a) shall not apply in any county having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2008, ch. 1040, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 1040, § 4. May 28, 2008.